Utah statutes.
62A-14-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Conservator" is as defined in Section 75-1-201.

(2)  "Court" is as defined in Section 75-1-201.

(3)  "Estate" is as defined in Section 75-1-201.

(4)  "Guardian" is as defined in Section 75-1-201.

(5)  "Incapacitated person" means a person who has been determined by a court, pursuant to Section 75-5-303, to be incapacitated after the office has determined that the person is 18 years of age or older and suffers from a mental or physical impairment as part of the prepetition assessment in Section 62A-14-107.

(6)  "Office" means the Office of Public Guardian.

(7)  "Property" is as defined in Section 75-1-201.

(8)  "Ward" means an incapacitated person for whom the office has been appointed as guardian or conservator.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2009 General Session

